South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4656.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: SECTION 1.  Section 62-2-1080(A) of the S.C. Code is amended to read: (A)(1) Not later than sixty days after receipt of the information required under Sections 62-2-1035 through 62-2-1075, a custodian shall comply with a request under this part from a fiduciary or designated recipient to disclose digital assets or terminate an account. If the custodian fails to comply, the fiduciary or designated recipient may apply to the court for an order directing compliance. (2) If the fiduciary applying for an order pursuant to item (1) is a parent or legal guardian of the user and the user is a deceased minor, the court shall treat the fiduciary's application as expedited and aim to resolve the application within thirty days after the application is filed. SECTION 2.  This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. ----XX----